test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_vuonjas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vuonjâš: # Checked with Matti Morottaja & Pekka Sammallahti; double čč should be the 1st form; č at least accepted, also recommended, if possible 
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Nom: vuonjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Gen: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Acc: vuonnjâš
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Ill: [vuoˊnjâččân, vuoˊnjâčân]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Loc: [vuoˊnjâččist, vuoˊnjâčist]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Com: [vuoˊnjâččáin, vuoˊnjâčáin]
    vuonjâš+N+Sg+Abe: vuonnjâšttáá
    vuonjâš+N+Ess: vuoˊnjâččin
    vuonjâš+N+Par: vuoˊnjâččid
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Nom: [vuoˊnjâččeh, vuoˊnjâčeh]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Gen: [vuoˊnjâččij, vuoˊnjâčij]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Acc: [vuoˊnjâččijd, vuoˊnjâčijd]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Ill: [vuoˊnjâččáid, vuoˊnjâčáid]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Loc: [vuoˊnjâččijn, vuoˊnjâčijn]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Com: [vuoˊnjâččijguin, vuoˊnjâčijguin]
    vuonjâš+N+Pl+Abe: [vuoˊnjâččijttáá, vuoˊnjâčijttáá]
